Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
§ 39-15-111.
Distribution.

License fees and interest collected by the department pursuant to this article shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall credit them to the general fund. All penalties collected by the department under this article shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

, except the total sum of penalties collected by the department and paid to the state treasurer shall be allocated based upon the ratio of each county’s population to the population of the state.

Revenues earned under W.S.

39-15-104

during each fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (p) of this section, for all revenue collected by the department under W.S.

39-15-104

the department shall:

Credit sixty-nine percent (69%) to the state general fund for deposit by the state treasurer except as provided by subsections (c) and (d) of this section and less any credit allowed pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b)(xi);

Deduct one percent (1%) from the remaining share to cover all administrative expenses and costs attributable to the remaining share and credit for deposit by the state treasurer into the general fund for that amount;

From the remaining share, until June 30, 2004, deduct an amount equivalent to one-half percent (0.5%) and thereafter deduct an amount equivalent to one percent (1%) of the tax collected under W.S. 39-15-104. From this amount, the department shall distribute until June 30, 2004, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) and thereafter forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00) annually to each county in equal monthly installments and then distribute the remainder to each county in the proportion that the total population of the county bears to the total population of the state. The balance shall then be paid monthly to the treasurers of the counties, cities and towns for payment into their respective general funds. The percentage of the balance that will be distributed to each county and its cities and towns will be determined by computing the percentage that net sales taxes collected attributable to vendors in each county including its cities and towns bear to total net sales taxes collected of vendors in all counties including their cities and towns. Subject to subsection (h) of this section, this percentage of the balance shall be distributed within each county as follows:

To each county in the proportion that the population of the county situated outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total population of the county including cities and towns;

To each city and town within the county in the proportion the population of the city or town bears to the population of the county.

If any person commences after the effective date of this act to construct an industrial facility, as that term is defined in W.S.

35-12-102

, under a permit issued pursuant to W.S.

35-12-106

, or if the federal or state government commences to construct any project within this state with an estimated construction cost as specified in the definition of industrial facility in W.S.

35-12-102

the department of revenue shall thereafter pay to the county treasurer and the county treasurer will distribute to the county, cities and towns of that county in which the industrial facility or project is located, impact assistance payments from the monies available under paragraph (b)(i) of this section. Each payment to the county treasurer shall be equal to an amount determined by the industrial siting council under this subsection and shall continue during the period of construction except that in the case of an industrial facility or a federal or state government project which is expected to continue in phases for an indefinite period of time, the department of revenue shall discontinue payments under this section when construction of any phase has ceased or been substantially completed for twelve (12) consecutive months. The person constructing the industrial facility and the counties affected by the construction of the industrial facility shall provide evidence at the public hearing held pursuant to W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i) of the mitigated and unmitigated impacts that the construction will have on the counties, cities and towns determined by the industrial siting council to be affected by the construction of the industrial facility. The industrial siting council shall review the evidence of the impacts and determine, applying a preponderance of evidence standard, the dollar amount of the unmitigated impacts. The council shall state, in the order issued under W.S. 35-12-113(a), the total dollar amount of the impact assistance payment and include specific findings of fact detailing the basis for the total dollar amount determination and if requested by the affected county, city or town, its justification for rejecting, in whole or in part, an application for an impact assistance payment. The impact assistance payment shall be distributed by the department of revenue in an amount and on a schedule determined by the council, based on evidence presented at the hearing. Under no circumstances shall the total dollar amount of the impact assistance payment exceed the maximum allowable percentage specified in this subsection of the total estimated material costs of the facility, as those costs are determined by the council. The maximum allowable percentage shall be two and twenty-five hundredths percent (2.25%) for facilities with total estimated materials costs of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) or less except as otherwise provided in this subsection, two percent (2%) for facilities with total estimated materials costs in excess of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) but less than eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000.00) and one and one-half percent (1.50%) for facilities with total estimated materials costs of eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000.00) or more. For facilities with total estimated materials costs of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000.00) or less, the council may increase the maximum allowable percentage to not more than two and seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%) if the council includes in the specific findings required under this subsection that the maximum allowable percentage of two and twenty-five hundredths percent (2.25%) is insufficient to mitigate the identified impacts. The council shall submit a report to the joint appropriations committee and the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee not later than ten (10) business days after increasing the maximum allowable percentage as specified in this subsection, including data to support the increase. The impact assistance payments shall be distributed to the county treasurer and the county treasurer will distribute to the county and to the cities and towns therein based on a ratio established by the industrial siting council during a public hearing held in accordance with W.S. 35-12-110(f)(i). In determining the distribution ratio, the industrial siting council may consider the extent and location of the unmitigated impacts, the populations of the affected counties, cities and towns, including any disproportionate impacts on smaller communities, and any other equitable factor. The industrial siting council shall review the distribution ratio for construction projects on a regular basis and make appropriate adjustments. A governing body which is primarily affected by the facility, or any person issued a permit pursuant to W.S.

35-12-106

, may petition the industrial siting council for review and adjustment of the distribution ratio or the amount of the impact assistance payment upon a showing of good cause. The impact assistance payment shall be in addition to all other distributions under this section, but no impact assistance payment shall be made for any period in which the county or counties are not imposing at least a one percent (1%) tax authorized by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) and 39-16-204(a)(i) or at least a total of a two percent (2%) sales tax authorized under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), (iii) and (vi) and at least a total of a two percent (2%) use tax authorized under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i), (ii) and (v). For purposes of this subsection, the industrial facility or federal or state government project will be deemed to be located in the county in which a majority of the construction costs will be expended, provided that upon a request from the county commissioners of any adjoining county to the industrial siting council, the council may determine that the social and economic impacts from construction of the industrial facility or federal or state government project upon the adjoining county are significant and establish the ratio of impacts between the counties and certify that ratio to the department of revenue who will thereafter distribute the impact assistance payment to the counties pursuant to that ratio. Each county, city and town that receives a distribution under this subsection shall provide an annual report to the industrial siting council describing how the impact assistance payment was expended. The report shall first be submitted not later than one (1) year after the impact assistance payment is approved and annually each year thereafter for the duration in which distributions are made and until all distributions are expended. The industrial siting council shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this subsection.

As used in subsection (c) of this section:

“Period of construction” begins at the commencement of construction and ends when the physical components of the industrial facility or federal or state government project are ninety percent (90%) complete, provided, if payments are already being made under this act, commencement of construction of another industrial facility or federal or state government project will not be considered for purposes of establishing a new impact assistance payment amount or determining when payments will commence under this act, but will only be considered for determining when the period of construction ends;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 107, § 2.

“Unmitigated impact” means an expense:

Incurred by a county, city or town directly or indirectly attributable to the construction of an industrial facility;

That is not otherwise mitigated by any other entity;

For medical services, fire and law enforcement services, roads and public utilities. Expenses shall be supported by an analysis prepared by the county, city or town of the current excess capacity in each of these areas. Expenses in these areas may include the employment of additional employees or officers only if the county, city or town has determined overtime compensation or contract labor would not be appropriate; and

Excluding expenses for which a county, city or town previously received an impact assistance payment unless the county, city or town can demonstrate the expenses are new or ongoing.

Vendors shall annually provide the department information indicating the amount of tax under this article collected from sales of propane, butane, liquefied gas and compressed natural gas. Upon verification by the department, the state treasurer shall annually transfer from the revenues deposited pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this section to the state highway fund ten percent (10%) of the amount collected under this article on sales of propane, butane, liquefied gas and compressed natural gas. This transfer of revenue replaces highway revenues existing prior to the enactment of this act.

In addition to the distribution specified in subsection (b) of this section, until June 30, 2004, twenty-nine and one-half percent (29.5%) and thereafter thirty-one percent (31%) of sales taxes collected from out-of-state vendors shall be distributed to counties, cities and towns in the same percentage as determined in paragraph (b)(iii) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 140, § 2.

If an annexation occurs under W.S.

15-1-404

, the department of revenue shall determine whether the proportion of sales taxes to be distributed to the general fund of the county in which the annexation takes place will be reduced by more than five percent (5%) solely as a result of the annexation. If so, then the distribution formula for sales taxes for the affected municipality and county is subject to the following:

Beginning with the month following the month in which the annexation occurs and continuing through the remainder of the fiscal year in which the annexation occurs, the annexing municipality shall receive credit only for thirty-five percent (35%) of the population of the area to be annexed with the remainder credited to the county;

In each of the succeeding four (4) fiscal years, the annexing municipality shall receive credit for an additional one-fourth (1/4) of the remaining sixty-five percent (65%) of the population of the area annexed with the remainder credited to the county;

The department of revenue shall proportionally adjust credits for population under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection for the remainder of the period based upon new population figures if a federal decennial census occurs before the period under paragraph (ii) of this subsection ends.

through (o) Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 54, § 2.

All revenue collected by the department under W.S. 39-15-104(h) shall be distributed as follows:

The department shall credit the revenue collected under W.S. 39-15-104(h)(i) as follows:

Eighty percent (80%) of the average annual revenue collected under this paragraph during the immediately preceding five (5) years shall be deposited each year in the Wyoming tourism account, which is hereby created. No funds shall be expended from the account until appropriated by the legislature. Funds in the account shall be used for the operation of the Wyoming tourism board and the Wyoming office of tourism;

Any amount of revenue that exceeds the amount determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be deposited as provided in this subparagraph. Revenue under this subparagraph shall be transferred to the Wyoming tourism reserve and projects account, which is hereby created. No funds shall be expended from the account until appropriated by the legislature.

The assessment revenue collected under W.S. 39-15-104(h)(ii) shall be distributed to each county on a monthly basis in proportionate shares determined by the amount of revenue collected within the county and its municipalities under W.S. 39-15-104(h)(ii) in relation to the entire amount collected under W.S. 39-15-104(h)(ii), to be distributed as follows:

If the county imposes a countywide lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the assessment revenue shall be distributed in the same manner as taxes collected under that paragraph are distributed under W.S. 39-15-211(a)(ii)(B) through (E);

If the county has not imposed a countywide lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the assessment revenue shall be distributed as follows:

If no city or town in the county has imposed a lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the assessment revenue shall be distributed to the county to be expended as provided in W.S. 39-15-211(a)(ii)(B);

If any city or town in the county has imposed a lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), assessment revenue equal to the amount of the tax imposed by the city or town shall be distributed to the city or town to be used as provided in W.S. 39-15-211(a)(ii)(B) through (E). The remainder shall be distributed to the county to be expended as provided in W.S. 39-15-211(a)(ii)(B).

No funds distributed to the Wyoming tourism account or the Wyoming tourism reserve and projects account as provided by subsection (p) of this section shall be expended for lobbying or legislative activities associated with any Wyoming local government or the Wyoming legislature.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; ch. 79, § 1; 2003, ch. 23, § 1; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; 2007, ch. 140, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 15, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2011, ch. 183, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 107, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 14, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), deleted “penalties” from the first sentence, and added the provisions for penalties in a new last sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b)(i) deleted “Until June 30, 2004, subject to subsection (g) of this section,” and deleted “seventy and one-half percent (70.5%) and thereafter”; repealed former (g), which read: “If the tax imposed under W.S. 39-15-104(b) is reduced to one-half of one percent (.5%) under W.S. 39-15-104(d), on and after September 1 of the year in which the reduction occurs, the distributions to the state general fund under paragraph (b)(i) of this section shall be reduced until June 30, 2004, from seventy and one-half percent (70.5%) to sixty-eight and one-half percent (68.5%) and thereafter from sixty-nine percent (69%) to sixty-five percent (65%).”

The 2008 amendment,

in (c), substituted “at least a one percent (1%)” for “the maximum” in the sixth sentence, and substituted “or at least a total of a two percent (2%) sales tax authorized under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), (iii) and (vi) and at least a total of a two percent (2%) use tax authorized under W.S. 39-16-204(a)(i), (ii) and (v)” for “as restricted by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(iv) and 39-16-204(a)(iii)” at the end of the sixth sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 15, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (h)(iii), substituted “federal decennial census” for “federal census.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective January 1, 2012, in (b)(i), added “and less any credit allowed pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b)(xi).”

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(iii) and (c), substituted “department” for “state treasurer”; substituted “For all revenue” for “Revenue” and “the department shall” for “shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall” in the introductory language of (b); inserted “for deposit by the state treasurer” in (b)(i); and inserted “for deposit by the state treasurer into” in (b)(ii).

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 107 §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015, in (c), substituted “department of revenue” for “state treasurer” in the first, second, and the present next-to-last sentence, rewrote the second sentence, inserted the third through seventh sentences, substituted “35-12-110(f)(i)” for “35-12-110” at the end of the eighth sentence, inserted “or the amount of the impact assistance payment” in the tenth sentence, and added the present last sentence; and in (d)(i), substituted “impact assistance payment amount” for “base period”; repealed former (d)(ii) , which defined “Base period amount.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in (b), added “Except as otherwise provided in subsection (p) of this section” in the second sentence; and added (p) and (q).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (c), in the fifth sentence substituted “include specific findings of fact detailing the basis for the total dollar,” added “determination and if requested by the affected county, city or town, its justification for rejecting, in whole or in part, an application for an impact assistance payment” for “the reasons for determining that” at the end, in the seventh sentence, added “total dollar amount of the”, substituted “the maximum allowable percentage specified in this subsection” for “two and seventy-six hundredths percent (2.76%)”, added the 8th through 10th, 12th, 17th, and 18th sentences; and added (d)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Laws 2008, ch. 15, § 2, provides: “This act is intended to clarify the effect of 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 133.
The legislature did not intend to require any county, city or town to impose the additional one percent (1%) general purpose optional excise tax authorized by that act in order to receive distributions under W.S. 39-15-111(c) or 39-16-111(d). The distribution of funds pursuant to W.S. 39-15-111(c) and 39-16-111(d) after the enactment of 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 133 until the effective date of this act should be made without any such additional requirement.
To the extent any funds were not so distributed based upon such additional requirement, those funds shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of this act upon this act becoming effective.”

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Laws 2022, ch. 29, § 2, provides, “This act shall only apply to impact assistance payments for industrial facility permit applications submitted on or after the effective date of this act. The impact assistance payments for industrial facilities that are not subject to this act shall be determined on the basis of the law as it existed at the time the request for the impact assistance payment was submitted to the industrial siting council.”

Impact assistance funds paid from retroactive date of permit. —

When the industrial siting council grants a permit which is retroactively dated to the first day of construction, that construction should be held to have commenced “under a permit” and the state treasurer should pay impact assistance funds covering the entire period during which construction was “under a permit.” Evanston v. Griffith, 715 P.2d 1381,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Administrative Law — A Case Against Retroactivity in Agency Permitting. Evanston v. Griffith, 715 P.2d 1381,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 171 (1987).